Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 23.1-2200.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of the University of Virginia (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “the Rector and Visitors of the University of Virginia” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as the University of Virginia (the University).

History.

Code 1919, § 806, § 23-69; 2016, c. 588.

Law Review.

For article, “The Legality of Ticket Tie-Ins in Intercollegiate Athletics,” see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1980).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.02 Competency. Bryson.

§ 23.1-2201.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 17 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least (i) 12 shall be appointed from the Commonwealth at large, (ii) 12 shall be alumni of the University, and (iii) one shall be a physician with administrative and clinical experience in an academic medical center.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint members from the list of nominees.

History.

Code 1919, § 807, §§ 23-70, 23-71; 1924, p. 145; 1930, p. 80; 1944, pp. 399, 400; 1945, p. 52; 1954, c. 343; 1980, c. 559; 1989, Sp. Sess., c. 5; 2008, cc. 55, 155; 2012, c. 599; 2016, c. 588.

Law Review.

For article “Legislators on Executive-Branch Boards Are Unconstitutional, Period,” see 28 Wm. & Mary Bill of Rts. J. 1 (2019).

§ 23.1-2202.
Meetings; officers; committees.

The board shall meet at the University at least once a year and at such other times and places as it determines. Special meetings of the board may be called by the rector or any three members. The secretary shall provide notice of any special meeting to each member.

Five members shall constitute a quorum.

The board shall appoint from its membership a rector to preside at its meetings and a vice-rector to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector. The board may appoint a substitute pro tempore to preside in the absence of the rector and vice-rector. The rector and the vice-rector shall perform any additional duties as prescribed by the board. The terms of the rector and vice-rector shall be for two years, commencing and expiring as provided in the board’s bylaws.

The board shall appoint a secretary who shall serve a term and perform duties as prescribed by the board.

Vacancies in the offices of rector, vice-rector, and secretary may be filled by the board for the unexpired term.

At every annual meeting of the board, the board shall appoint an executive committee for the transaction of business in the recess of the board, consisting of at least three and not more than seven members, to serve for the period of one year or until the next regular annual meeting.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 809, 810, §§ 23-74, 23-75; 1966, c. 467; 2003, c. 655; 2014, c. 567; 2015, c. 327; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2203.
Courses of study to be taught.

The following courses of study shall be taught at the University: the Latin, Greek, Hebrew, French, Spanish, Italian, German, and Anglo-Saxon languages; the different branches of mathematics, pure and physical; natural philosophy, chemistry, and mineralogy, including geology; the principles of agriculture; botany, anatomy, surgery, and medicine; zoology, history, ideology, general grammar, ethics, rhetoric, and belles lettres; and civil government, political economy, the law of nature and of nations, and municipal law.

History.

Code 1919, § 817, § 23-63; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2204.
Salary of president and professors; fees.

The president and each of the professors shall receive a stated salary. The board may supplement such stated salary out of the fees for tuition and other revenues of the University.

History.

Code 1919, § 816, § 23-64; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2205.
Secured obligations.

It shall be unlawful for the board to issue its obligations to be secured by deed of trust on its real estate without the prior consent of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1919, § 821, § 23-65; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2206.
Payment of bonds of the University.

For the payment of the bonds, with the interest on such bonds, issued pursuant to the act entitled “An act to authorize the rector and board of visitors of the University of Virginia to issue bonds to pay off and discharge their floating debt and maturing obligations,” approved March 28, 1871, the current revenue of the University and the property held by the Commonwealth for the purposes of the University shall continue liable.

History.

Code 1919, § 818, § 23-66; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2207.
Payment of interest on debt of University; sinking fund.

Out of the appropriation made by the General Assembly for the support of the University, there shall be first set apart, annually, a sum sufficient to pay the interest accruing on the existing interest-bearing debt of the University, except as provided in §

23.1-1109

, and to constitute a sinking fund for the liquidation of the principal of such debt. Such sum shall be applied to no other purpose or object.

History.

Code 1919, § 820, § 23-67; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2208.
Provision for interest on certain bonds.

The Comptroller shall place in the state treasury a sum sufficient to pay semiannually six percent annual interest on two sums of $50,000 in consol bonds of the Commonwealth donated by William W. Corcoran, of Washington, D.C., to the University and under the act of January 13, 1877, and the act of April 2, 1879, converted into registered bonds in the name of the board.

History.

Code 1919, § 827, § 23-68; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2209.
Powers and duties.

The board shall (i) care for and preserve all property belonging to the University, (ii) grant to the president of the University supreme administrative direction over all the schools, colleges, divisions, and branches of the University, and (iii) examine the progress of the students in each year and give to those who excel in any course of study such honors as it deems proper.

The board may (i) remove the president of the University or any professor with the assent of two-thirds of its members, (ii) prescribe the duties of each professor and the course and mode of instruction, (iii) appoint a comptroller and proctor and employ any other agent or servant, (iv) regulate the renting of the rooms and dormitories, and (v) to enable the board to procure a supply of water and construct and maintain a system of waterworks, drainage, and sewerage for the University, acquire such springs, lands, and rights-of-way as may be necessary, according to the provisions of Title 25.1.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 811, 813, §§ 23-76, 23-78; 1938, p. 442; 1956, cc. 12, 689; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2210.
Investment of endowment funds, endowment income, etc.

As used in this section:“Derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments, including any contract commonly known as a “swap,” that gives the University the right or obligation to deliver, receive delivery of, or make or receive payments based on changes in the price, value, yield, or other characteristic of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets or changes in a rate, index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or group of assets.“Financial security” means (i) any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, certificate of interest, collateral-trust certificate, preorganization certificate of subscription, transferable share, investment contract, voting-trust certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, or fractional undivided interest in oil, gas, or other mineral rights; (ii) any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on any security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities, including any interest therein or based on the value thereof; (iii) any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currency; (iv) in general, any interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or (v) any certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim security for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase any financial security.“Option” means an agreement or contract whereby the University may grant or receive the right to purchase, sell, or pay or receive the value of any personal property asset, including any agreement or contract that relates to any security, contract, or agreement.

The board shall invest and manage the endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, and local funds of or held by the University in accordance with this section and the provisions of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.).

No member of the board is personally liable for losses suffered by any endowment fund, endowment income, gift, other nongeneral fund reserve and balance, or local funds of or held by the University arising from investments made pursuant to the provisions of subsection B.

The investment and management of endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, or local funds of or held by the University is not subject to the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

In addition to the investment practices authorized by the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.), the board may invest or reinvest the endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, and local funds of or held by the University in derivatives, options, and financial securities.

The authority provided in this section to invest and reinvest nongeneral fund reserves and balances of or held by the University is predicated upon an approved management agreement between the University and the Commonwealth.

History.

1998, cc. 121, § 23-76.1, 132; 2000, cc. 818, 1014; 2002, cc. 582, 595; 2007, c. 434; 2008, c. 184; 2016, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to exclusions of records of specific public bodies and certain other limited exemptions under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.7

. As to authority to conduct closed meetings for certain limited purposes, see §

2.2-3711

. As to the University’s selection of services related to the management and investment of its endowment funds being exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4343

.